Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.010

Definition of commission form.

The commission form of city government means a city government in which the legislative powers and duties are exercised by a commission of three, consisting of a mayor, a commissioner of finance and accounting, and a commissioner of streets and public improvements, and in which the executive and administrative powers and duties are distributed among the three departments as follows:

(1) Department of public safety of which the mayor shall be the superintendent;

(2) Department of finance and accounting of which the commissioner of finance and accounting shall be the superintendent;

(3) Department of streets and public improvements of which the commissioner of streets and public improvement shall be the superintendent.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.010. Prior: (i) 1911 c 116 s 11, part; RRS s 9100, part. (ii) 1943 c 25 s 3, part; 1911 c 116 s 12, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9101, part.]